Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-212
Hospital or nursing home, defined.

Hospital or nursing home shall mean (1) any private nonprofit hospital, nonprofit nursing home, corporation, association, or institution, (2) any public hospital, public nursing home, or institution authorized by law to provide or operate health facilities in this state, and (3) any cooperative hospital service organization which is described in section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code or any similar nonprofit corporation, whether or not such corporation is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(e) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 12;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 16;

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 54.